Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.150

Investigation of complaint—Cease and desist order/notice of intent to issue—Final determination—Fine—Temporary cease and desist order—Action/who may maintain—Remedies not limited.

(1) The disciplinary authority may investigate complaints concerning practice by unlicensed persons of a profession or business for which a license is required by the chapters specified in RCW 18.235.020. In the investigation of the complaints, the director has the same authority as provided the disciplinary authority under RCW 18.235.030.

(2) The disciplinary authority may issue a notice of intent to issue a cease and desist order to any person whom the disciplinary authority has reason to believe is engaged or is about to engage in the unlicensed practice of a profession or operation of a business for which a license is required by the chapters specified in RCW 18.235.020.

(3) The disciplinary authority may issue a notice of intent to issue a cease and desist order to any person whom the disciplinary authority has reason to believe is engaged or is about to engage in an act or practice constituting a violation of this chapter or the chapters specified in RCW 18.235.020(2) or a rule adopted or order issued under those chapters.

(4) The person to whom such a notice is issued may request an adjudicative proceeding to contest the allegations. The notice shall include a brief, plain statement of the alleged unlicensed activities, act, or practice constituting a violation of this chapter or the chapters specified in RCW 18.235.020(2) or a rule adopted or order issued under those chapters. The request for hearing must be filed within twenty days after service of the notice of intent to issue a cease and desist order. The failure to request a hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the disciplinary authority may enter a permanent cease and desist order, which may include a civil fine. All proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(5) If the disciplinary authority makes a final determination that a person has engaged or is engaging in unlicensed practice or other act or practice constituting a violation of this chapter or the chapters specified in RCW 18.235.020(2) or a rule adopted or order issued under those chapters, the disciplinary authority may issue a permanent cease and desist order. In addition, the disciplinary authority may impose a civil fine in an amount not exceeding one thousand dollars for each day upon which the person engaged in the unlicensed practice of a profession or operation of a business for which a license is required by one or more of the chapters specified in RCW 18.235.020. The proceeds of such a fine shall be deposited in the related program account.

(6) The disciplinary authority may issue a temporary cease and desist order if a person is engaged or is about to engage in unlicensed practice or other act or practice constituting a violation of this chapter or the chapters specified in RCW 18.235.020(2) or a rule adopted or order issued under those chapters if the disciplinary authority makes a written finding of fact that the public interest will be irreparably harmed by delay in issuing an order. The person receiving a temporary cease and desist order shall be provided an opportunity for a prompt hearing. A temporary cease and desist order shall remain in effect until further order of the disciplinary authority. The failure to request a prompt or regularly scheduled hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the disciplinary authority may enter a permanent cease and desist order, which may include a civil fine.

(7) The cease and desist order is conclusive proof of unlicensed practice or other act or practice constituting a violation of this chapter or the chapters specified in RCW 18.235.020(2) or a rule adopted or order issued under those chapters and may be enforced under RCW 7.21.060. This method of enforcement of the cease and desist order or civil fine may be used in addition to, or as an alternative to, any provisions for enforcement of agency orders set out in chapter 34.05 RCW.

(8) The attorney general, a county prosecuting attorney, the director, a board or commission, or any person may, in accordance with the laws of this state governing injunctions, maintain an action in the name of the state of Washington to enjoin any person practicing a profession or business without a license for which a license is required by the chapters specified in RCW 18.235.020. All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or assessed by a court because of a violation of this section shall be deposited in the related program account.

(9) The civil remedies in this section do not limit the ability to pursue criminal prosecution as authorized in any of the acts specified in RCW 18.235.020 nor do the civil remedies limit any criminal sanctions.

[ 2007 c 256 s 20; 2002 c 86 s 116.]